test/src/morphology/N-sijdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sijdd: # Noun 'village' - full paradigm
     sijdd+N+Sg+Nom: sijdd
     sijdd+N+Sg+Gen: siid
     sijdd+N+Sg+Acc: siid
     sijdd+N+Sg+Ill: siˊjdde
     sijdd+N+Sg+Loc: siidâst
     sijdd+N+Sg+Com: siidin
     sijdd+N+Sg+Ess: sijddân
     sijdd+N+Sg+Par: sijddâd
     sijdd+N+Sg+Abe: siidtää
     sijdd+N+Pl+Nom: siid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Gen: siidi
     sijdd+N+Pl+Acc: siidid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Ill: siidid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Loc: siidin
     sijdd+N+Pl+Com: siidivuiˊm
     sijdd+N+Pl+Ess: sijddân
     sijdd+N+Pl+Par: sijddâd
     sijdd+N+Pl+Abe: siiditää


     
     
